Hawaii, session 2025, HB956.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "CHAPTER Ironworkers §   -1  Definitions.  As used in this chapter: "Apprenticeship program" means a training program approved and registered with the director in conformance with chapter 372 and rules adopted by the director pursuant to chapter 372. "Department" means the department of labor and industrial relations. "Director" means the director of labor and industrial relations. "Ironworker" means any person who: (1)  Cuts, builds, welds, and places structural steel and iron on roads, buildings, bridges, and other iron projects; and (2)  Is enrolled in or completed an apprenticeship program for ironworkers. "Iron project" means any project that reinforces or enhances the safety and durability of structures, including precast concrete, high-rise structures, condominiums, dwelling units, stadiums, bridges, solar farms, wind farms, power plants, harbors, airports, schools, universities, office buildings, malls, and state and government buildings.  "Iron project" includes work set forth in article IV of the 2021 Constitution of the International Association of Bridge, Structural, Ornamental and Reinforcing Iron Workers. §   -2 Iron projects; disassembly; dismantlement; demolition; requirement. No person shall disassemble, dismantle, or demolish an iron project unless the person has completed an apprenticeship program for ironworkers. §   -3  Penalties.  (a)  Any person who violates this chapter shall be fined not more than $500 or imprisoned not more than one year, or both. (b) Any person who contracts services to disassemble, dismantle, or demolish an iron project with a person in violation of this chapter, shall be fined not more than $1,000. §   -4  Rulemaking authority.  The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter." SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________